Arkansas, session 2025, SB169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 6(a)(2), concerning
voter registration application forms, is amended to read as follows to
correct a grammatical and punctuation error:
(2) Such forms shall include, in identical print, statements
that:
(A) Specify voter eligibility requirements;
(B) Contain an attestation that the applicant meets all
voter eligibility requirements and that the applicant does not claim the
right to vote in another county or state;
(C) Specify the penalties provided by law for submission
of a false voter registration application;
(D) Inform applicants that where they register to vote
will be kept confidential;
(E) Inform applicants that declining to register will also
be kept confidential; and
(F) Inform applicants that they will be required to verify
*SSS004*
01/31/2025 10:40:01 AM SSS004

SB169
their registration when voting in person or by absentee ballot by providing a
required document or identification card as provided in Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13.;
(G) Inform the applicant that if the voter registration
application is being collected by a third-party voter registration
organization, the third-party voter registration organization may be unable
to deliver the application to the permanent registrar in the county in which
the applicant resides before the thirty-day voter registration deadline to
vote in the next election and that the applicant may elect to deliver the
application in person or by mail; and
(H) Inform the applicant of the process to determine if
the application has been received by the Secretary of State.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 9(a), concerning
eligibility to register to vote, is amended to read as follows to correct a
grammatical and punctuation error:
(a) All persons may register who:
(1) Have not been convicted of a felony unless the person's
sentence has been discharged or the person has been pardoned;
(2) Have not been adjudged mentally incompetent by a court of
competent jurisdiction; and
(3) Meet one (1) of the following requirements:
(A) Are qualified electors who have not previously
registered;
(B) Will become qualified electors during the thirty-day
period immediately prior to the next election scheduled within the county; or
(C) Are otherwise qualified electors but whose
registration has been cancelled in a manner provided for by this amendment.;
and
(4) Are citizens of the United States.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 11(a), concerning
cancellation of voter registrations, is amended to read as follows to correct
a grammatical and punctuation error:
(a) It shall be the duty of the permanent registrar to cancel the
registration of voters:
01/31/2025 10:40:01 AM SSS004

SB169
(1) Who have failed to respond to address confirmation mailings
described in section 10 of this amendment and have not voted or appeared to
vote in an election during the period beginning on the date of the notice and
ending on the day after the date of the second general election for federal
office that occurs after the date of the address confirmation notice;
(2) Who have changed their residence to an address outside the
county;
(3) Who have died;
(4) Who have been convicted of a felony and have not discharged
their sentence or been pardoned;
(5) Who are not lawfully qualified or registered electors of
this state or of the county; or
(6) Who have been adjudged mentally incompetent by a court of
competent jurisdiction.; or
(7) Who are not citizens of the United States.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Constitution; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Constitution.



01/31/2025 10:40:01 AM SSS004